California, session 20252026, SB1346.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 30333.1 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:30333.1. The commission shall periodically review its regulations and procedures and determine what revisions, if any, are necessary and appropriate to simplify and expedite expedite and simplify the review of any matter that is before the commission for action pursuant to this division. The commission shall implement, within 60 days of the review, any revisions it determines to be appropriate, so that its regulations and procedures may continue to be as simple and expeditious expeditious and simple as practicable.